Tennessee, session 114, HB0295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-107(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(29) Doula services performed by a person who has received a verification of
certification to perform doula services from the department of health pursuant to § 63-1-
177. As used in this subdivision (a)(29), "doula services" means a service that provides
continuous emotional and physical support throughout labor and birth and intermittently
during the prenatal and postpartum periods.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
63-1-177.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of health;
(2) "Department" means the department of health; and
(3) "Doula services" means a service that provides continuous emotional
and physical support throughout labor and birth and intermittently during the
prenatal and postpartum periods.
(b) Using the findings and recommendations of the doula services advisory
committee, as described in § 63-15-103, the commissioner shall establish by rule a
process by which the department issues a verification of certification to a person who
HB0295
000077
- 1 -

has demonstrated the following by providing proof of completion of a doula training
program recognized by the commissioner:
(1) An understanding of basic anatomy and physiology as related to
pregnancy, the childbearing process, breastfeeding or chest feeding, and the
postpartum period;
(2) The capacity to employ different strategies for providing emotional
support, education, and resources during the perinatal period;
(3) Knowledge of and the ability to assist families with utilizing a wide
variety of nonclinical labor coping and physical comfort strategies;
(4) An awareness of strategies to foster effective communication
between clients, their families, support services, and healthcare providers; and
(5) Knowledge of community-based, publicly and federally funded, and
clinical resources available to the client for any need outside the doula's scope of
practice.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming
a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2025,
the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000077